test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_UUHL_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - t'ahlgúuhl - ENGLISH : # CLASS_UUHL_STEM_1

     t'ahlgúuhl+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: t'ahlgúuhl
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+RELATIVE: t'ahlgúuhls
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: t'ahlgúuhläsaa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: t'ahlgúuhläs
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhläsaang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhläsga
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhläsaas
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: t'ahlgúuhläsaa.ang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl'uuj
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl'uujang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: t'ahlgúuhläsaa'uujang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl'us
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: t'ahlgúuhl'ujaa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: t'ahlgúuhl'uujaangaa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhläsaa'us
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhläsaa'ahlans
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: t'ahlgúuhläseehl
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: t'ahlgúuhl'uu
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl'waa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl'waa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl'waang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: t'ahlgúuhl'wägan
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: t'ahlgúuhl'aawaa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: t'ahlgúuhl'aawaan
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: t'ahlgúuhl'waas
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: t'ahlgúuhl'aawaas
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: t'ahlgúuhl'waa.ang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: t'ahlgúuhl'aawaa.ang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: t'ahlgúuhl'wägiinii
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: t'ahlgúuhl'wägaangaa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: t'ahlgúuhl'wägaangaan
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: t'ahlgúuhl'waaäsaa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: t'ahlgúuhl'waaäs
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhl'waaäsaang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhl'waaäsga
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhl'waaäsaas
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: t'ahlgúuhl'waaäsaa.ang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhl'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhl'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhl'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhl'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl'waa'uuj
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl'waa'uujang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: t'ahlgúuhl'waaäsaa'uujang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl'waa'us
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: t'ahlgúuhl'waa'ujaa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: t'ahlgúuhl'waa'uujaangaa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhl'waaäsaa'us
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl'waa'ahlanggang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: t'ahlgúuhl'waa'ahlanggan
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: t'ahlgúuhl'waa'ahlanggiinii
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhl'waaäsaa'ahlans
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: t'ahlgúuhl'waa'ahlans
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: t'ahlgúuhl'aawaa'ahlang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: t'ahlgúuhl'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl'aawaa'ahlanggang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: t'ahlgúuhl'waa'ahl
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: t'ahlgúuhl'waaäseehl
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: t'ahlgúuhl'ang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl'angga
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl'ang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl'anggang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: t'ahlgúuhl'anggan
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: t'ahlgúuhl'aangaa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: t'ahlgúuhl'aangaan
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: t'ahlgúuhl'ans
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: t'ahlgúuhl'aangaas
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: t'ahlgúuhl'angang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: t'ahlgúuhl'aangaa.ang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: t'ahlgúuhl'anggang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: t'ahlgúuhl'anggiinii
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: t'ahlgúuhl'anggaangaa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: t'ahlgúuhl'anggaangaan
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: t'ahlgúuhl'angäsaa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: t'ahlgúuhl'angäs
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhl'angäsaang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhl'angäsga
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhl'angäsaas
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: t'ahlgúuhl'angäsaa.ang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'uuj
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'uujang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: t'ahlgúuhl'angäsaa'uujang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'us
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'ujaa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'uujaangaa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhl'angäsaa'us
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl'aang'ahlanggang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: t'ahlgúuhl'aang'ahlanggan
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: t'ahlgúuhl'aang'ahlanggiinii
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhl'angäsaa'ahlans
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: t'ahlgúuhl'aang'ahlans
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: t'ahlgúuhl'aangaa'ahlang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: t'ahlgúuhl'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl'aangaa'ahlanggang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: t'ahlgúuhl'aang'ahl
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: t'ahlgúuhl'angäseehl
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'uu
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'waa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'waa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'waang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'wägan
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'aawaa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'aawaan
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'waas
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'aawaas
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'waa.ang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'aawaa.ang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'wägiinii
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'wägaangaa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'wägaangaan
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'waaäsaa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'waaäs
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'waaäsaang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'waaäsga
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'waaäsaas
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhl'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhl'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhl'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhl'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'waa'uuj
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'waa'uujang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'waa'us
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'waa'ujaa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'waaäsaa'us
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'waa'ahlans
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'waa'ahl
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: t'ahlgúuhl'ang'waaäseehl
